Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.005

Provisions applicable to "plan 1," "plan 2," and "plan 3."

RCW 41.32.010 through 41.32.067 shall apply to members of plan 1, plan 2, and plan 3.

[ 1995 c 239 s 101; 1992 c 72 s 4; 1991 c 35 s 30; 1990 c 274 s 16. Prior: 1989 c 273 s 15; 1989 c 272 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 239: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1996, except that sections 301 and 302 of this act shall take effect immediately [March 13, 1996]." [ 1996 c 39 s 23; 1995 c 239 s 327.]

Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: "Part headings and subchapter headings as used in this act constitute no part of the law." [ 1995 c 239 s 328.]

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Findings—Construction—1990 c 274: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Purpose—1989 c 272: "The legislature recognizes that inflation erodes the purchasing power of retirement benefits. Although the benefit provided to state retirees from social security is fully protected, the benefits provided by the public employees' retirement system, plan 1, and the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 provide an automatic cost-of-living adjustment only for persons who receive the minimum benefit.

The purpose of this act is to add provisions to the teachers' retirement system and the public employees' retirement system which will help mitigate the impact of inflation on retirees of those systems. These additional provisions are intended to reflect and implement the following policies:

(1) The minimum benefit is increased in order to provide a more adequate basic standard of living to persons who retired long ago under lower salaries and less generous retirement benefit formulas; and

(2) Retirees whose benefits have lost forty percent of their purchasing power are made eligible for automatic adjustments which are provided in a manner that is consistent with the retirement age and benefit provisions of plan 2 of the teachers' retirement system and the public employees' retirement system." [ 1989 c 272 s 1.]

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 293: See notes following RCW 41.32.755.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.